incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__فروزاند">
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزاند</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزاند</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافروزاند</l><r>افروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزانده</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزانده</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافروزانده</l><r>افروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزان</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافروزان</l><r>افروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزان</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافروزان</l><r>افروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزان</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فروزان</l><r>فروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافروزان</l><r>افروزاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__فروخت">
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروخت</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فروخت</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافروخت</l><r>افروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فروخته</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فروخته</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافروخته</l><r>افروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افروختن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__فراشت">
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراشت</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فراشت</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافراشت</l><r>افراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراشته</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فراشته</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافراشته</l><r>افراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>فراز</l><r>فراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یافراز</l><r>افراشتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__شامید">
                        <e><i>آ</i><p><l>شامید</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>آ</i><p><l>شامید</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاشامید</l><r>آشامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>آ</i><p><l>شامیده</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>آ</i><p><l>شامیده</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاشامیده</l><r>آشامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><i>آ</i><p><l>شام</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یاشام</l><r>آشامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i>آ</i><p><l>شام</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یاشام</l><r>آشامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>آ</i><p><l>شام</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>آ</i><p><l>شام</l><r>شامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاشام</l><r>آشامیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="آشامیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__شامید"/></e>
                            <e lm="افراشتن"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__فراشت"/></e>
                            <e lm="افروختن"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__فروخت"/></e>
                            <e lm="افروزاندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__فروزاند"/></e>
